Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2332
Revocation by writing or by act.

A will or any part thereof is revoked

(1) by a subsequent will which, as is evident either from its terms or from competent evidence of its terms, revokes the prior will or part expressly or by inconsistency; or

(2) by being burned, torn, canceled, obliterated, or destroyed, with the intent and for the purpose of revoking it by the testator or by another person in the presence of and by the direction of the testator.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 54, UPC § 2-507.

In order to prove by parol evidence the subsequent execution of a will that revoked a prior will, that evidence must establish by clear and convincing evidence the requirements of proper execution as set out in section 30-2327. In re Estate of Thompson, 214 Neb. 899, 336 N.W.2d 590 (1983).